California, session 20252026, AB2229.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 89427) is added to Part 55 of Division 8 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: CHAPTER 4.5. The California State University Enrollment, Access, and Retention of Nontraditional NoncontinuousStudents Program89427. As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Campus” means a campus of the California State University.(b) “Nontraditional “Noncontinuous student” means a student who was previously enrolled at a campus of the California State University and withdrew before the conferral of a baccalaureate degree. degree, excluding students who withdrew due to pending academic disqualification or pending disciplinary expulsion.89428. (a) The California State University Enrollment, Access, and Retention of Nontraditional Noncontinuous Students Program is hereby established to increase the reenrollment rates of nontraditional noncontinuous students.(b) The Chancellor of the California State University shall adopt a policy to prioritize enrollment funding to campuses that meet enrollment figures and engage in outreach efforts to reenroll former California State University students who may have withdrawn from a campus, as part of the campuses’ retention and enrollment efforts.(c) On or before July 1, 2027, the trustees, in collaboration with the Academic Senate of the California State University, shall adopt a policy related to the evaluation of transcripts of nontraditional noncontinuous students who wish to reenroll in the California State University. The policy shall ensure that the evaluation of transcripts does all of the following:(1) If a period of five years or less has elapsed since the student enrolled in coursework, accepts all California State University coursework as applicable to a degree in the original field of study the student was attempting before withdrawing from the campus.(2) If a period of more than five years has elapsed since the student enrolled in coursework, both of the following:(A) Accepts all the lower division general education California State University courses regardless of the time lapse lapsed between the student’s reenrollment.(B) For upper division California State University applicable courses, maximizes credit to the student for degree completion and minimizes time to degree.(3) Prohibits requiring a student to repeat California State University coursework already completed with a satisfactory grade.(4) For California Community College courses taken after enrollment at the California State University, maximizes credit to the student for degree completion and minimizes time to degree.(d) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, each campus shall designate one nontraditional noncontinuous student advisor for the campus to do both of the following:(A) Assist with the implementation of the policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (c).(B) Provide nontraditional noncontinuous students with academic advising and support services to help the students enroll in coursework that optimizes their ability to complete their intended major. To the extent possible, the advisor shall provide the noncontinuous student with a course map to graduation.(2) This subdivision shall not be interpreted to require a campus to hire a new advisor to comply with the requirements of this subdivision.(e) Commencing July 1, 2027, each campus shall provide priority registration to a nontraditional noncontinuous student who is returning to complete a baccalaureate degree.89429. On or before September 1, 2028, the trustees shall maintain an internet-accessible data dashboard that includes all of the following:(a) The number of nontraditional noncontinuous students who have reenrolled at a campus.(b) Program participation demographics, including all of the following:(1) Student race and ethnicity.(2) Whether a student is a federal Pell Grant recipient, as available.(3) Whether a student is a first-generation college student.(4) Whether a student is a Cal Grant recipient.(5) Whether a student is a Middle Class Scholarship recipient pursuant to Article 22 (commencing with Section 70020) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5.(6) The number of community college classes taken after the student withdrew from the California State University and before they reenrolled at the California State University.(7) The time period between the student’s withdrawal and reenrollment at the California State University.(c) (1) The time-to-degree rates and completion rates for nontraditional noncontinuous students.(2) The full-time enrollment equivalent of the information described in paragraph (1) may also be included.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________